Missouri, session 2026, HB3051.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 301.550 and 301.553, RSMo, are repealed and three new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 301.550, 301.552, and 301.553, to read as
follows:
301.550. 1. The definitions contained in section 301.010 shall apply to sections
301.550 to 301.580, and in addition as used in sections 301.550 to 301.580, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Boat dealer", any natural person, partnership, or corporation who, for a
commission or with an intent to make a profit or gain of money or other thing of value, sells,
barters, exchanges, leases or rents with the option to purchase, offers, attempts to sell, or
negotiates the sale of any vessel or vessel trailer, whether or not the vessel or vessel trailer is
owned by such person. The sale of [six] eightor more vessels or vessel trailers or both in any
calendar year shall be required as evidence that such person is eligible for licensure as a boat
dealer under sections 301.550 to 301.580; except that, such sales requirements shall be
waived for entities also licensed as boat manufacturers under section 301.559 who custom
manufacture boats:
(a) For use with biological research and management equipment for fisheries; or
(b) For use with scientific sampling and for geological or chemistry purposes.

EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3051 2
The boat dealer shall demonstrate eligibility for renewal of his license by selling six or more
vessels or vessel trailers or both in the prior calendar year while licensed as a boat dealer
pursuant to sections 301.550 to 301.580;
(2) "Boat manufacturer", any person engaged in the manufacturing, assembling or
modification of new vessels or vessel trailers as a regular business, including a person,
partnership or corporation which acts for and is under the control of a manufacturer or
assembly in connection with the distribution of vessels or vessel trailers;
(3) "Commission", the Missouri motor vehicle commission established under
section 301.552;
(4) "Department", the Missouri department of revenue;
[(4)] (5) "Director", the director of the Missouri department of revenue;
[(5)] (6) "Emergency vehicles", motor vehicles used as ambulances, law enforcement
vehicles, and fire fighting and assistance vehicles;
(7) "Executive director", the executive director of the Missouri motor vehicle
commission;
[(6)] (8) "Manufacturer", any person engaged in the manufacturing, assembling or
modification of new motor vehicles or trailers as a regular business, including a person,
partnership or corporation which acts for and is under the control of a manufacturer or
assembly in connection with the distribution of motor vehicles or accessories for motor
vehicles;
[(7)] (9) "Motor vehicle broker", a person who holds himself or herself out through
solicitation, advertisement, or otherwise as one who offers to arrange a transaction involving
the retail sale of a motor vehicle, and who is not:
(a) A dealer, or any agent, or any employee of a dealer when acting on behalf of a
dealer;
(b) A manufacturer, or any agent, or employee of a manufacturer when acting on
behalf of a manufacturer;
(c) The owner of the vehicle involved in the transaction; or
(d) A public motor vehicle auction or wholesale motor vehicle auction where buyers
are licensed dealers in this or any other jurisdiction;
[(8)] (10) "Motor vehicle dealer" or "dealer", any person who, for commission or with
an intent to make a profit or gain of money or other thing of value, sells, barters, exchanges,
leases or rents with the option to purchase, or who offers or attempts to sell or negotiates the
sale of motor vehicles or trailers whether or not the motor vehicles or trailers are owned by
such person; provided, however, an individual auctioneer or auction conducted by an
auctioneer licensed pursuant to chapter 343 shall not be included within the definition of a
motor vehicle dealer. The sale of eight or more motor vehicles or trailers in any calendar year

HCS HB 3051 3
shall be required as evidence that such person is engaged in the motor vehicle business and is
eligible for licensure as a motor vehicle dealer under sections 301.550 to 301.580. Any
licensed motor vehicle dealer failing to meet the minimum vehicle sales requirements as
referenced in this subsection shall not be qualified to renew his or her license for one year. To
be eligible for license renewal, applicants shall meet the minimum requirement of eight sales
per year;
[(9)] (11) "New motor vehicle", any motor vehicle being transferred for the first time
from a manufacturer, distributor or new vehicle dealer which has not been registered or titled
in this state or any other state and which is offered for sale, barter or exchange by a dealer
who is franchised to sell, barter or exchange that particular make of motor vehicle. The term
"new motor vehicle" shall not include manufactured homes, as defined in section 700.010;
[(10)] (12) "New motor vehicle franchise dealer", any motor vehicle dealer who has
been franchised to deal in a certain make of motor vehicle by the manufacturer or distributor
of that make and motor vehicle and who may, in line with conducting his business as a
franchise dealer, sell, barter or exchange used motor vehicles;
[(11)] (13) "Person" includes an individual, a partnership, corporation, limited
liability company,an unincorporated society or association, joint venture,or any other entity;
[(12)] (14) "Powersport dealer", any motor vehicle dealer who sells, either pursuant
to a franchise agreement or otherwise, primarily motor vehicles including but not limited to
motorcycles, all-terrain vehicles, and personal watercraft, as those terms are defined in this
chapter and chapter 306;
[(13)] (15) "Public motor vehicle auction", any person, firm or corporation who takes
possession of a motor vehicle whether by consignment, bailment or any other arrangement,
except by title, for the purpose of selling motor vehicles at a public auction by a licensed
auctioneer;
[(14)] (16) "Recreational motor vehicle dealer", a dealer of new or used motor
vehicles designed, constructed or substantially modified for use as temporary housing
quarters, including sleeping and eating facilities which are either permanently attached to the
motor vehicle or attached to a unit which is securely attached to the motor vehicle;
[(15)] (17) "Storage lot", an area within the same city or county where a dealer may
store excess vehicle inventory;
[(16)] (18) "Trailer dealer", any person selling, either exclusively or otherwise,
trailers as defined in section 301.010. A trailer dealer may acquire a motor vehicle for resale
only as a trade-in for a trailer. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 301.010 and section
301.069, trailer dealers may purchase one driveaway license plate to display such motor
vehicle for demonstration purposes. The sale of [six] eight or more trailers in any calendar
year shall be required as evidence that such person is engaged in the trailer business and is

HCS HB 3051 4
eligible for licensure as a trailer dealer under sections 301.550 to 301.580. Any licensed
trailer dealer failing to meet the minimum trailer and vehicle sales requirements as referenced
in this subsection shall not be qualified to renew his or her license for one year. Applicants
who reapply after the one-year period shall meet the requirement of [six] eight sales per year;
[(17)] (19) "Used motor vehicle", any motor vehicle which is not a new motor
vehicle, as defined in sections 301.550 to 301.580, and which has been sold, bartered,
exchanged or given away or which may have had a title issued in this state or any other state,
or a motor vehicle so used as to be what is commonly known as a secondhand motor vehicle.
In the event of an assignment of the statement of origin from an original franchise dealer to
any individual or other motor vehicle dealer other than a new motor vehicle franchise dealer
100 of the same make, the vehicle so assigned shall be deemed to be a used motor vehicle and a
101 certificate of ownership shall be obtained in the assignee's name. The term "used motor
102 vehicle" shall not include manufactured homes, as defined in section 700.010;
103 [(18)] (20) "Used motor vehicle dealer", any motor vehicle dealer who is not a new
104 motor vehicle franchise dealer;
105 [(19)] (21) "Vessel", every boat and watercraft defined as a vessel in section 306.010;
106 [(20)] (22) "Vessel trailer", any trailer, as defined by section 301.010 which is
107 designed and manufactured for the purposes of transporting vessels;
108 [(21)] (23) "Wholesale motor vehicle auction", any person, firm or corporation in the
109 business of providing auction services solely in wholesale transactions at its established place
110 of business in which the purchasers are motor vehicle dealers licensed by this or any other
111 jurisdiction, and which neither buys, sells nor owns the motor vehicles it auctions in the
112 ordinary course of its business. Except as required by law with regard to the auction sale of a
113 government-owned motor vehicle, a wholesale motor vehicle auction shall not provide
114 auction services in connection with the retail sale of a motor vehicle;
115 [(22)] (24) "Wholesale motor vehicle dealer", a motor vehicle dealer who sells motor
116 vehicles only to other new motor vehicle franchise dealers or used motor vehicle dealers or
117 via auctions limited to other dealers of any class.
118 2. For purposes of sections 301.550 to 301.580, neither the term motor vehicle nor the
119 term trailer shall include manufactured homes, as defined in section 700.010.
120 3. Dealers shall be divided into classes as follows:
121 (1) Boat dealers;
122 (2) Franchised new motor vehicle dealers;
123 (3) Used motor vehicle dealers;
124 (4) Wholesale motor vehicle dealers;
125 (5) Recreational motor vehicle dealers;
126 (6) Historic motor vehicle dealers;

HCS HB 3051 5
127 (7) Classic motor vehicle dealers;
128 (8) Powersport dealers; [and]
129 (9) Trailer dealers; and
130 (10) Public motor vehicle auctions.
301.552. 1. The "Missouri Motor Vehicle Commission" is hereby created and
shall be responsible for the licensing of all motor vehicle dealers, boat dealers, wholesale
motor vehicle auctions, public motor vehicle auctions, and wholesale motor vehicle
dealers under the provisions of sections 301.550 to 301.580 and under any current rules
and regulations or any rules or regulations that the commission may adopt. The
commission shall have no supervision, authority, or control over motor vehicle
manufacturers except with respect to those described under subdivision (2) of
subsection 3 of this section. The commission's main office shall be in Jefferson City
in quarters provided by the office of administration, division of facilities management,
design, and construction. That division shall also arrange for other needed office space
for the commission or its staff.
2. All the powers and duties of the department of revenue under sections 301.550
to 301.580 are transferred by type III transfer, as provided in the Omnibus State
Reorganization Act of 1974, to the Missouri motor vehicle commission. The director of
the department of revenue shall have no supervision, authority, or control over the
actions or decisions of the Missouri motor vehicle commission or the executive director
of the commission. The director of revenue, the commission, and the commission's
executive director shall collaborate to ensure proper administration of sections 301.550
to 301.580 and any other applicable laws and regulations.
3. The Missouri motor vehicle commission shall be comprised of nine members,
to be selected and appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate,
who shall be appointed as follows:
(1) Four members who are licensed franchised motor vehicle dealers, of whom:
(a) Three are licensed motor vehicle dealers, one of whom shall be a licensed
recreational motor vehicle dealer; and
(b) One is a licensed boat dealer;
(2) Three members who are manufacturers, importers, or distributors engaged
in the business of selling motor vehicles to retail consumers in this state from a
dealership if the manufacturer, importer, or distributor owned the dealership and
initially submitted a dealer license application to the Missouri department of revenue on
or before August 28, 2023, provided that the license is subsequently granted, and the
ownership or controlling interest of such dealership is not transferred, sold, or conveyed
to another person or entity required to be licensed under chapter 407; and

HCS HB 3051 6
(3) Two members who represent the general public and have no pecuniary
interest in any motor vehicle or boat dealership.
4. Each member of the commission shall be:
(1) A citizen of the United States; and
(2) A resident of the state.
5. Commission members shall serve four-year terms. For the initial
appointments, three members shall serve two-year terms, three members shall serve
three-year terms, and three members shall serve four-year terms. Subsequent
appointments shall be for four years and members shall serve until their term expires
or until their successor is appointed and qualified. Vacancies shall be filled by the
governor, by and with the advice and consent of the senate, for the remainder of the
unexpired term.
6. The commission shall elect from among its members a chair and a secretary,
each of whom shall serve a one-year term. Meetings shall be held as prescribed by the
commission, but shall be held at least quarterly. Special meetings may be called by the
chair upon adequate notice provided by the executive director. To conduct business, a
quorum of five members of the commission shall be in attendance. Members shall
receive no salary or other compensation for their services as members but shall receive
their necessary and actual travel and related expenses incurred while engaged in the
discharge of their official duties.
7. The commission shall have the authority to adopt an official seal that shall
contain the official seal of the state of Missouri bordered by the inscription "Missouri
Motor Vehicle Commission".
8. (1) Orders and decisions of the commission shall meet the following voting
thresholds:
(a) For any matter affecting only franchised motor vehicle dealers or boat
dealers, approval shall require:
a. The affirmative vote of five members of the commission; and
b. The affirmative vote of a majority of the members appointed under
subdivision (1) of subsection 3 of this section.

No such matter shall be considered or voted upon unless at least one member appointed
under subdivision (1) of subsection 3 of this section is duly appointed and serving at the
time of the vote.
(b) For any matter affecting only manufacturers, importers, or distributors
described under subdivision (2) of subsection 3 of this section, approval shall require:
a. The affirmative vote of five members of the commission; and

HCS HB 3051 7
b. The affirmative vote of a majority of the members appointed to represent
such manufacturers, importers, or distributors under subsection 3 of this section.

No such matter shall be considered or voted upon unless at least one member appointed
to represent such manufacturers, importers, or distributors is duly appointed and
serving at the time of the vote.
(c) For any matter affecting both franchised dealers and manufacturers,
importers, or distributors described under subdivision (3) of subsection 3 of this section,
approval shall require:
a. The affirmative vote of at least five members of the commission; and
b. The affirmative vote of at least one member appointed under subdivision (1)
of subsection 3 of this section and the affirmative vote of at least one member appointed
to represent manufacturers, importers, or distributors described under subdivision (2)
of subsection 3 of this section.
(2) All orders or decisions of the commission shall be in writing and signed by
the current chair with the official seal affixed thereto.
9. All commission members, employees, and individuals providing information
or participating in commission operations shall be immune from civil liability, provided
their actions were performed in good faith, without malice, and reasonably related to
the scope of the commission's inquiry.
10. The commission shall employ an executive director, who shall serve at the
pleasure of the commission. Additional staff may be employed as required to fulfill the
commission's duties and responsibilities under sections 301.550 to 301.580. The
executive director's duties shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) Supervising and directing commission staff;
(2) Receiving and promptly addressing correspondence and inquiries;
(3) Serving as custodian of commission files and records;
(4) Maintaining minutes of commission proceedings;
(5) Keeping public records of annual new and used motor vehicle sales by
100 individual dealers;
101 (6) Managing complaints against licensees submitted to the commission and
102 maintaining a log to be made available for public inspection, subject to applicable law
103 regarding disclosure. The complaints shall be logged into the record, which shall
104 include at a minimum the licensee's name; the name of the complaining party, if given;
105 the date of the complaint; and a brief statement of the complaint and its ultimate
106 disposition. The executive director shall ensure licensees are informed of complaints
107 filed against them;

HCS HB 3051 8
108 (7) Maintaining custody of the commission's official seal and affixing such seal to
109 licenses and orders; and
110 (8) Performing any other duties necessary to administer sections 301.550 to
111 301.580 and rules and regulations promulgated thereto.
112 11. The annual salary of the executive director shall be set according to the state
113 uniform classification and pay system and shall not be below range G14 as defined by
114 that system.
115 12. The department of revenue and the Missouri motor vehicle commission shall
116 work collaboratively with each other to:
117 (1) Carry out the provisions of sections 301.550 to 301.580 in order to promote
118 compliance with all laws, ordinances, and administrative rules and regulations relating
119 to the conduct of motor vehicle dealers, boat dealers, wholesale motor vehicle auctions,
120 public motor vehicle auctions, and wholesale motor vehicle dealers; and
121 (2) Jointly manage and utilize the Missouri motor vehicle commission fund and
122 motor vehicle and driver's license system for the purpose of dealer licensing, which shall
123 include, but not be limited to, activities related to compliance, investigations, and dealer
124 licensing operations.
125 13. Nothing in sections 301.550 to 301.580 shall limit or restrain the enforcement
126 powers of the director of the department of revenue in matters not specifically granted
127 to the commission.
128 14. The commission shall have the authority to promulgate those rules and
129 regulations necessary to perform the provisions of sections 301.550 to 301.580. Any rule
130 or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
131 authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is
132 subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
133 section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
134 general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
135 disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
136 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be
137 invalid and void.
301.553. [1. The department of revenue shall be responsible for the licensing of all
manufacturers, motor vehicle dealers, boat dealers, wholesale motor vehicle auctions, public
motor vehicle auctions and wholesale motor vehicle dealers pursuant to the provisions of
sections 301.550 to 301.580 and the rules and regulations which it may adopt.
2. All the powers, duties and functions of the Missouri motor vehicle commission,
sections 301.550 to 301.573, in effect immediately prior to July 1, 1997, are transferred by
type I transfer, as provided in the Omnibus State Reorganization Act of 1974, to the

HCS HB 3051 9
department of revenue. The rules and regulations adopted by the commission which were
adopted pursuant to this section prior to July 1, 1997, shall continue in effect after July 1,
1997.
3. All orders or decisions of the department shall be in writing, signed by the director
and the official seal affixed thereto.
4. The department shall have the authority to promulgate those rules and regulations
necessary to perform the provisions of sections 301.550 to 301.580 and is vested with those
powers and duties necessary and proper to enable it to fully and effectively carry out the
provisions of sections 301.550 to 301.580. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated under the
authority of sections 301.550 to 301.580 shall become effective unless it has been
promulgated pursuant to the provisions of section 536.024.] The Missouri motor vehicle
commission shall have authority to:
(1) Mitigate complaints and hold hearings concerning disputes involving any
holder of a license issued under sections 301.550 to 301.580; and
(2) Assess fees as provided under section 301.562, which shall be deposited into
the motor vehicle commission fund established under section 301.560.
Section B. The enactment of section 301.552 and the repeal and reenactment of
sections 301.550 and 301.553 of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
✔